Utah statutes.
40-8-6.   Board -- Powers, functions, and duties.
In addition to those provided in Title 40, Chapter 6, Board and Division of
Oil, Gas, and Mining, the board has the following powers, functions, and
duties:
(1)  To enact rules according to the procedures and requirements of Title 63G,
Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, that are reasonably necessary
to carry out the purposes of this chapter.
(2)  To hold hearings and to issue orders or other appropriate instruments
based upon the results of those hearings.
(3)  To issue emergency orders according to the requirements and provisions of
Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act.
(4)  To do all other things and take such other actions within the purposes of
this act as may be necessary to enforce its provisions.
